chrome/third_party/hunspell/dictionaries/ca_ES.aff
SFX A   ava    às          ava              #    cantàs
SFX A   ava    éssim       [^cçgj]ava       # 4. cantéssim
SFX A   cava   quéssim     cava             #    cerquéssim
SFX A   çava   céssim      çava             #    cacéssim
SFX A   gava   guéssim     gava             #    porguéssim
SFX A   java   géssim      java             #    vengéssim
SFX A   ava    àssim       ava              #    cantàssim
SFX A   ava    éssiu       [^cçgj]ava       # 5. cantéssiu
SFX A   cava   quéssiu     cava             #    cerquéssiu
SFX A   çava   céssiu      çava             #    cacéssiu
SFX A   gava   guéssiu     gava             #    porguéssiu
SFX A   java   géssiu      java             #    vengéssiu
SFX A   ava    àssiu       ava              #    cantàssiu
SFX A   ava    essin       [^cçgj]ava       # 6. cantessin
SFX A   cava   quessin     cava             #    cerquessin
SFX A   çava   cessin      çava             #    cacessin
SFX A   gava   guessin     gava             #    porguessin
SFX A   java   gessin      java             #    vengessin
SFX A   ava    assin       ava              #    cantassin
SFX A   ava    a           ava              # 2. canta - imperatiu <IMP>
SFX A   ava    i           [^cçgjeiou]ava   # 3. canti
SFX A   ava    ï           [^aeiou][eio]ava #    suï
SFX A   iava   ï           [aeiou]iava      #    desmaï
SFX A   guava  güi         guava            #    enaigüi
SFX A   quava  qüi         quava            #    adeqüi
SFX A   uava   uï          [^gq]uava        #    evacuï
SFX A   cava   qui         cava             #    cerqui
SFX A   çava   ci          çava             #    caci
SFX A   gava   gui         gava             #    porgui
SFX A   java   gi          java             #    vengi
SFX A   ava    em          [^cçgju]ava      # 4. cantem
SFX A   ava    em          [^gq]uava        #    suem
SFX A   guava  güem        guava            #    enaigüem
SFX A   quava  qüem        quava            #    adeqüem
SFX A   cava   quem        cava             #    cerquem
SFX A   çava   cem         çava             #    cacem
SFX A   gava   guem        gava             #    porguem
SFX A   java   gem         java             #    vengem
SFX A   ava    eu          [^cçgju]ava      # 5. canteu
SFX A   ava    eu          [^gq]uava        #    sueu
SFX A   guava  güeu        guava            #    enaigüeu
SFX A   quava  qüeu        quava            #    adeqüeu
SFX A   cava   queu        cava             #    cerqueu
SFX A   çava   ceu         çava             #    caceu
SFX A   gava   gueu        gava             #    porgueu
SFX A   java   geu         java             #    vengeu
SFX A   ava    au          ava              #    cantau
SFX A   ava    in          [^cçgjeiou]ava   # 6. cantin
SFX A   ava    ïn          [^aeiou][eio]ava #    suïn
SFX A   iava   ïn          [aeiou]iava      #    desmaïn
SFX A   guava  güin        guava            #    enaigüin
SFX A   quava  qüin        quava            #    adeqüin
SFX A   uava   uïn         [^gq]uava        #    evacuïn
SFX A   cava   quin        cava             #    cerquin
SFX A   çava   cin         çava             #    cacin
SFX A   gava   guin        gava             #    porguin
SFX A   java   gin         java             #    vengin

# Verbs en -ir, formes comunes als grups III, IV i V
SFX M Y 78
SFX M   iré    im          [^aeiou]iré      # 4. patim       <IPR>
SFX M   iré    im          [gq]uiré         #    seguim
SFX M   iré    ïm          [^gq]uiré        #    induïm
SFX M   iré    ïm          [aeio]iré        #    traïm
SFX M   iré    iu          [^aeiou]iré      # 5. patiu
SFX M   iré    iu          [gq]uiré         #    seguiu
SFX M   iré    ïu          [^gq]uiré        #    induïu
SFX M   iré    ïu          [aeio]iré        #    traïu
SFX M   iré    ia          [^aeiou]iré      # 1. patia       <IIM>
SFX M   iré    ia          [gq]uiré         #    seguia
SFX M   iré    ïa          [^gq]uiré        #    induïa
SFX M   iré    ïa          [aeio]iré        #    traïa
SFX M   iré    ies         [^aeiou]iré      # 2. paties
SFX M   iré    ies         [gq]uiré         #    seguies
SFX M   iré    ïes         [^gq]uiré        #    induïes
SFX M   iré    ïes         [aeio]iré        #    traïes
SFX M   iré    ia          [^aeiou]iré      # 3. patia
SFX M   iré    ia          [gq]uiré         #    seguia
SFX M   iré    ïa          [^gq]uiré        #    induïa
SFX M   iré    ïa          [aeio]iré        #    traïa
SFX M   iré    íem         iré              # 4. patíem, traíem
SFX M   iré    íeu         iré              # 5. patíeu, traíeu
SFX M   iré    ien         [^aeiou]iré      # 6. patien
SFX M   iré    ien         [gq]uiré         #    seguien
SFX M   iré    ïen         [^gq]uiré        #    induïen
SFX M   iré    ïen         [aeio]iré        #    traïen
SFX M   iré    í           iré              # 1. patí        <IPE>
SFX M   iré    ires        [^aeiou]iré      # 2. patires
SFX M   iré    ires        [gq]uiré         #    seguires
SFX M   iré    ïres        [^gq]uiré        #    induïres
SFX M   iré    ïres        [aeio]iré        #    traïres
SFX M   iré    í           iré              # 3. patí
SFX M   iré    írem        iré              # 4. patírem, traírem
SFX M   iré    íreu        iré              # 5. patíreu, traíreu
SFX M   iré    iren        [^aeiou]iré      # 6. patiren
SFX M   iré    iren        [gq]uiré         #    seguiren
SFX M   iré    ïren        [^gq]uiré        #    induïren
SFX M   iré    ïren        [aeio]iré        #    traïren
SFX M   iré    iré         iré              # 1. patiré, trairé <FUT>
SFX M   iré    iràs        iré              # 2. patiràs, trairàs
SFX M   iré    irà         iré              # 3. patirà, trairà
SFX M   iré    irem        iré              # 4. patirem, trairem
SFX M   iré    ireu        iré              # 5. patireu, traireu
SFX M   iré    iran        iré              # 6. patiran, trairan
SFX M   iré    iria        iré              # 1. patiria, trairia <CON>
SFX M   iré    iries       iré              # 2. patiries, trairies
SFX M   iré    iria        iré              # 3. patiria, trairia
SFX M   iré    iríem       iré              # 4. patiríem, trairíem
SFX M   iré    iríeu       iré              # 5. patiríeu, trairíeu
SFX M   iré    irien       iré              # 6. patirien, trairien
SFX M   iré    im          [^aeiou]iré      # 4. patim       <SPR>
SFX M   iré    im          [gq]uiré         #    seguim
SFX M   iré    ïm          [^gq]uiré        #    induïm
SFX M   iré    ïm          [aeio]iré        #    traïm
SFX M   iré    iu          [^aeiou]iré      # 5. patiu
SFX M   iré    iu          [gq]uiré         #    seguiu
SFX M   iré    ïu          [^gq]uiré        #    induïu
SFX M   iré    ïu          [aeio]iré        #    traïu
SFX M   iré    ís          iré              # 1. patís       <SIM>
SFX M   iré    issis       [^aeiou]iré      # 2. patissis
SFX M   iré    issis       [gq]uiré         #    seguissis
SFX M   iré    ïssis       [^gq]uiré        #    induïssis
SFX M   iré    ïssis       [aeio]iré        #    traïssis
SFX M   iré    ís          iré              # 3. patís
SFX M   iré    íssim       iré              # 4. patíssim
SFX M   iré    íssiu       iré              # 5. patíssiu
SFX M   iré    issin       [^aeiou]iré      # 6. patissin
SFX M   iré    issin       [gq]uiré         #    seguissin
SFX M   iré    ïssin       [^gq]uiré        #    induïssin
SFX M   iré    ïssin       [aeio]iré        #    traïssin
SFX M   iré    im          [^aeiou]iré      # 4. patim       <IMP>
SFX M   iré    im          [gq]uiré         #    seguim
SFX M   iré    ïm          [^gq]uiré        #    induïm
SFX M   iré    ïm          [aeio]iré        #    traïm
SFX M   iré    iu          [^aeiou]iré      # 5. patiu
SFX M   iré    iu          [gq]uiré         #    seguiu
SFX M   iré    ïu          [^gq]uiré        #    induïu
SFX M   iré    ïu          [aeio]iré        #    traïu
